California, session 20252026, AB1381.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44030.6 is added to the Education Code, to read:44030.6. (a) The superintendent of a school district or county office of education, or the administrator of a charter or private school, shall not hire a certificated or classified employee without completing the employment background check outlined in Section 44939.5 for certificated staff or Section 44051 for classified staff, as applicable. (b) The failure to complete an employment background check required by subdivision (a) is unprofessional conduct and may subject the superintendent of the school district or county office of education, or the administrator of a charter or public school, to adverse action by the commission.SEC. 2. Section 44939.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:44939.5. (a) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools shall not enter into an agreement that would prevent a mandatory report of egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or any other state or federal agency.(b) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools shall not expunge from an employee’s personnel file, nor shall they enter into an agreement that would authorize expunging from an employee’s personnel file, credible complaints of, substantiated investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932. This prohibition does not preclude removing, or entering into an agreement to remove, documents containing allegations that have been the subject of a hearing before an arbitrator, school board, personnel commission, Commission on Professional Competence, or administrative law judge, in which the employee prevailed, the allegations were determined to be false, not credible, or unsubstantiated, or a determination was made that the discipline was not warranted.(c) (1) (A) A person applying for a certificated position at a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school shall provide that prospective employer with a complete list of every school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that the applicant has previously been an employee of.(B) The failure to provide the information described in subparagraph (A) is unprofessional conduct and may subject the person applying for the certificated position to adverse action by the commission.(2) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools considering an applicant for a certificated position shall inquire with each school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school and diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that previously employed the applicant, as disclosed pursuant to paragraph (1), as to whether the applicant, while previously employed by the school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school was the subject of any credible complaints of, substantiated investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, that were required to be reported to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.(3) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools that have made a report of an employee’s egregious misconduct to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall disclose this fact to a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school considering an application for employment from the employee, upon inquiry, and, notwithstanding any other law, shall provide the inquiring school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school with a copy of all relevant information that was reported to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, within its possession.(d) Any school employee who alleges that another school employee has engaged in egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, knowing at the time of making the allegation that the allegation was false, shall be subject to certificate revocation, if applicable.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 44052.5 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 44052, to read:44052.5.(a)The commission shall include a section in the statewide data system developed pursuant to Section 44052 that identifies whether the commission received any reports of a certificated employee’s possible misconduct, including reports described in paragraph (2), submitted to the commission by a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school. The section of the data system shall include both of the following data fields:(1)The full name, date of birth, and last four digits of the social security number of the credentialholder or applicant.(2)The name of each school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school that has submitted a complaint, information, or indictment against the credentialholder or applicant, including reports pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 44940 of this code, or a report pursuant to Section 44030.5, 44052, 44242.5, or 44947 of this code or Section 80303 or 80304 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations to the commission.(b)The commission shall do all of the following:(1)Within five business days of receiving a request for access to the section of the statewide data system described in subdivision (a) from a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school, provide the requesting entity access to the data system for the purposes of this section.(2)Develop a secure interface that allows only a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school to review the data listed in subdivision (a).(3)Not authorize the submission of any additional information into the section of the data system, other than the data listed in subdivision (a).(c)(1)The commission shall serve only as the data administrator for the information required to be included as part of the statewide data system pursuant to this section. As data administrator, the commission shall ensure the secure operation and technical functionality of the statewide data system, but shall not be responsible for verifying the truthfulness or legal sufficiency of the reports submitted to the commission by a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school.(2)The commission shall not be held liable for any claims related to the publication of data within the section of the data system.(d)A school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school identified in the section of the data system as having submitted a report for a certificated employee pursuant to this section shall provide a copy of all relevant information within its possession to the inquiring school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school.SEC. 2.Section 44939.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:44939.5.(a)School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools shall not enter into an agreement that would prevent a mandatory report of egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or any other state or federal agency.(b)School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools shall not expunge from an employee’s personnel file, nor shall they enter into an agreement that would authorize expunging from an employee’s personnel file, credible complaints of, substantiated investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932. This prohibition does not preclude removing, or entering into an agreement to remove, documents containing allegations that have been the subject of a hearing before an arbitrator, school board, personnel commission, Commission on Professional Competence, or administrative law judge, in which the employee prevailed, the allegations were determined to be false, not credible, or unsubstantiated, or a determination was made that the discipline was not warranted.(c)(1)A person applying for a certificated position at a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school shall provide that prospective employer with a complete list of every school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that the applicant has previously been an employee of.(2)(A)(i) Commencing July 1, 2027, school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools considering an applicant for a certificated position shall check the section of the statewide data system maintained by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to Section 44052.5 as to whether it received a copy of a complaint, information, or indictment from a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school, including reports pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 44940 of this code, or a report pursuant to Section 44030.5, 44052, 44242.5, or 44947 of this code or Section 80303 or 80304 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to the applicant being the subject of any credible complaints of, substantiated investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, that were required to be reported to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing and identify any reporting entities.(ii)Upon checking the statewide data system maintained by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to clause (i) regarding an applicant, the school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school shall request, from each school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school that submitted documentation to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, a copy of all relevant information within that entity’s possession that was reported to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. (B)School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools may also inquire with each school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school and diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that previously employed the applicant, as disclosed pursuant to paragraph (1), as to whether the applicant, while previously employed by the school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school was the subject of any credible complaints of, substantiated investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, that were required to be reported to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.(3)(A)School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools that have made a report of an employee’s egregious misconduct to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall disclose this fact to a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school considering an application for employment from the employee, upon inquiry, and, notwithstanding any other law, shall provide the inquiring school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school with a copy of all relevant information that was reported to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, within its possession.(B)A private school that has made a report of an employee’s egregious misconduct to law enforcement shall provide an inquiring school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school with a copy of all relevant information regarding the report.(d)A school employee who alleges that another school employee has engaged in egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, knowing at the time of making the allegation that the allegation was false, shall be subject to certificate revocation, if applicable.SEC. 3.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.